District of Columbia statutes.
1-609.04

Special appointments.

Special noncompetitive appointments may be made to positions provided under the authority of this section. Such positions are covered by the provisions of § 1-609.02 relating to the Excepted Service positions. The nature of the appointment must be made known to the employee prior to effecting the appointment.

(1)

Individuals appointed to positions created under public employment programs established by law.

(2)

Positions established under special employment programs of a transitional nature designed to provide training or job opportunities for rehabilitation purposes, including persons with disabilities, ex-offender or other disadvantaged groups.

(3)

Positions filled by the appointment of a federal employee under the mobility provisions of the Intergovernmental Personnel Act of 1970 (84 Stat. 1901, Pub. L. 91-648).

(4)

Positions established under federal grant funded programs having a limited or indefinite duration, provided state merit requirements are not applicable; provided, however, that this paragraph shall not apply to any employees of the Board of Education or of the Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia.

(5)

Positions established to employ professional, scientific, or technical experts or consultants.

(6)

Positions established under cooperative educational and study programs.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 904, 25 DCR 5740
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-177, § 3(j), 33 DCR 7241
Aug. 1, 1996, D.C. Law 11-152, § 302(i), 43 DCR 2978
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 3(f), 53 DCR 6198

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-602.04, § 1-607.02, § 1-609.05, and § 1-636.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-610.4.
1973 Ed., § 1-339.4.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-305, in par. (2), substituted “persons with disabilities” for “developmentally disabled or handicapped persons”.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority for Summer Youth Employment Program participants, see Mayor’s Order 83-131, May 24, 1983; Mayor’s Order 84-86, April 6, 1984.

Editor's Notes

Repeal of § 3 of Law 6-177: Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 6-177 provided that the provisions of § 3 are repealed on the 1st day following the 36-month period after February 24, 1987.

Repeal of § 4(b) of Law 6-177: Section 3(b) of D.C. Law 8-74, effective March 15, 1990, provided that § 4(b) of D.C. Law 6-177 is repealed.